Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-3121
Reciprocity.

The department, with the recommendation of the board, may issue a license based on licensure in another jurisdiction to practice as a psychologist to a person who meets the requirements of the Psychology Practice Act or substantially equivalent requirements as determined by the department, with the recommendation of the board.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1055.